Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-4,117
Act, how cited.

Sections 79-4,117 to 79-4,129 shall be known and may be cited as the Learning Community Reorganization Act.

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 28;

Laws 2007, LB641, § 5.